New York, session 2025-2026, S6962.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 of section 553 of the execu- 2 tive law, as added by section 3 of part A of chapter 501 of the laws of 3 2012, is amended to read as follows: 4 (a) establishing procedures for the timely response to, and effective 5 investigation of, allegations of reportable incidents that are accepted 6 by the statewide vulnerable persons' central register, such procedures 7 shall include but not be limited to, requiring the referral to 9-1-1 of 8 reportable incidents which includes suspicious and unexplained injuries 9 to include broken bones, hematomas, open wounds beyond minor first aid, 10 black eyes, swollen noses, extreme and questionable bruising, choke 11 marks, burns, individuals found unresponsive and all deaths to a 9-1-1 12 operator; 13 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11076-01-5